Utah statutes.
63M-1-1402.   Members -- Meetings -- Expenses.
(1) (a)  The board shall consist of 13 members appointed by the governor to
four-year terms of office with the consent of the Senate.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(2)  The members may not serve more than two full consecutive terms unless the
governor determines that an additional term is in the best interest of the
state.
(3)  Not more than seven members of the board may be of the same political
party.
(4) (a)  The members shall be representative of:
(i)  all areas of the state with six being appointed from separate
geographical areas as provided in Subsection (4)(b); and
(ii)  a diverse mix of business ownership or executive management of tourism
related industries.
(b)  The geographical representatives shall be appointed as follows:
(i)  one member from Salt Lake, Tooele, or Morgan County;
(ii)  one member from Davis, Weber, Box Elder, Cache, or Rich County;
(iii)  one member from Utah, Summit, Juab, or Wasatch County;
(iv)  one member from Carbon, Emery, Grand, Duchesne, Daggett, or Uintah
County;
(v)  one member from San Juan, Piute, Wayne, Garfield, or Kane County; and
(vi)  one member from Washington, Iron, Beaver, Sanpete, Sevier, or Millard
County.
(c)  The tourism industry representatives of ownership or executive management
shall be appointed as follows:
(i)  one member from ownership or executive management of the lodging
industry, as recommended by the lodging industry for the governor's
consideration;
(ii)  one member from ownership or executive management of the restaurant
industry, as recommended by the restaurant industry for the governor's
consideration;
(iii)  one member from ownership or executive management of the ski industry,
as recommended by the ski industry for the governor's consideration; and
(iv)  one member from ownership or executive management of the motor vehicle
rental industry, as recommended by the motor vehicle rental industry for the
governor's consideration.
(d)  One member shall be appointed at large from ownership or executive
management of business, finance, economic policy, or the academic media
marketing community.
(e)  One member shall be appointed from the Utah Tourism Industry Coalition as
recommended by the coalition for the governor's consideration.
(f)  One member shall be appointed to represent the state's counties as
recommended by the Utah Association of Counties for the governor's
consideration.
(g) (i)  The governor may choose to disregard a recommendation made for a
board member under Subsections (4)(c), (e), and (f).
(ii)  The governor shall request additional recommendations if recommendations
are disregarded under Subsection (4)(g)(i).
(5)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term from the same geographic area or
industry representation as the member whose office was vacated.
(6)  Seven members of the board constitute a quorum for conducting board
business and exercising board powers.
(7)  The governor shall select one of the board members as chair and one of
the board members as vice chair, each for a four-year term as recommended by
the board for the governor's consideration.
(8) (a)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services,
but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member’s official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(9)  The board shall meet monthly or as often as the board determines to be
necessary at various locations throughout the state.
(10)  Members who may have a potential conflict of interest in consideration
of fund allocation decisions shall identify the potential conflict prior to
voting on the issue.
(11) (a)  The board shall determine attendance requirements for maintaining a
designated board seat.
(b)  If a board member fails to attend according to the requirements
established pursuant to Subsection (11)(a), the board member shall be replaced
upon written certification from the board chair or vice chair to the governor.
(c)  A replacement appointed by the governor under Subsection (11)(b) shall
serve for the remainder of the board member's unexpired term.
(12)  The board's office shall be in Salt Lake City.
